Massachusetts, session 194th, H2242.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8C of chapter 40 of the Massachusetts General Law as appearing in the 2012
official edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following
paragraph:-
A Conservation Commission may administer and enforce a local wetlands ordinance or
by-law that is adopted by a municipality, only to the extent that it imposes standards or other
requirements that are more stringent than or otherwise exceed those set forth in Wetlands
Protection Act (G.L. Ch. 131 § 40) and regulations (310 CMR 10.00) thereunder, and only if,
prior to adoption by a municipality, the Department of Environmental Protection shall review
and approve any such proposed local wetlands ordinance or by-law based upon findings that the
proposed ordinance or by-law has a generally recognized scientific basis, is a recommended best
of 2

practice technique, is necessary to protect unusual local resources that warrant special or
enhanced protection, and does not conflict with the Wetlands Protection Act (G.L. Ch. 131 § 40)
and regulations (310 CMR 10.00) thereunder. An appeal of a decision made under a local
wetlands ordinance or by-law shall be made to the Department of Environmental Protection in
accordance with the Wetlands Protection Act (G.L. Ch. 131 § 40) and regulations (310 CMR
10.00) thereunder.
of 2